Arkansas, session 2025, HB1706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-1-116. Ranked choice voting prohibited.
(a) As used in this section, "ranked choice voting" means a voting
method that:
(1) Allows a voter to rank candidates for an office in order of
preference; and
(2) Has the ballots cast tabulated in multiple rounds following
the elimination of a candidate until a single candidate attains a majority
vote.
(b) Ranked choice voting shall not be used to determine the election
or nomination of a candidate to any local, state, or federal elective office
in this state.
(c) An existing or future ordinance enacted or adopted by a county, a
municipality, or other local governmental entity that is in conflict with
this section is void.
(d) This section shall not apply to a qualified elector who is
*SSS165*
03/04/2025 11:27:02 AM SSS165

HB1706
entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens
Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, or who votes as a member of the uniformed services of the United States
or a citizen residing outside the United States under § 7-5-406.
































03/04/2025 11:27:02 AM SSS165